Utah statutes.
41-6a-2003.   Automatic license plate reader systems -- Restrictions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person or governmental entity may not use an automatic license plate reader system.

(2)  An automatic license plate reader system may be used:

(a)  by a law enforcement agency for the purpose of protecting public safety, conducting criminal investigations, or ensuring compliance with local, state, and federal laws;

(b)  by a governmental parking enforcement entity for the purpose of enforcing state and local parking laws;

(c)  by a parking enforcement entity for regulating the use of a parking facility;

(d)  for the purpose of controlling access to a secured area;

(e)  for the purpose of collecting an electronic toll; or

(f)  for the purpose of enforcing motor carrier laws.



Enacted by Chapter 447, 2013 General Session

